Utah statutes.
63B-1a-301.   Sinking fund -- Creation -- Investment of monies.
(1)  For bonds authorized and issued as provided in this chapter, the
commission shall create a sinking fund, to be administered by the state
treasurer.
(2)  All monies deposited in the sinking fund, from whatever source, shall be
used to pay debt service on the bonds.
(3)  The commission or the state treasurer may create separate accounts within
the sinking fund.
(4) (a)  The state treasurer may, by following the procedures and requirements
of Title 51, Chapter 7, State Money Management Act, invest any money contained
in the sinking fund until it is needed for the purposes for which the fund was
created.
(b)  Unless otherwise provided in the resolution of the commission authorizing
the issuance of bonds under this chapter, the treasurer:
(i)  shall deposit all income from the investment of any sinking fund monies
into the sinking fund; and
(ii)  may use it for the payment of debt service on the bonds.
